Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1213
Qualified physician surrogate, defined.

Qualified physician surrogate means a qualified, trained medical person designated by a qualified physician in writing to act as an agent for the physician in directing the actions or renewal of licensure of emergency care providers.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 497;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 27.